Illinois, session 104th, HB5654.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $2,901,300, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Illinois Arts Council for operational expenses for the 8fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 9    Section 5. The sum of $17,207,200, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 11Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for Grants and 12Administrative Expenses to enhance the cultural environment in 13Illinois in the approximate amounts below:14  For Grants and Financial Assistance15   for Creative Sector (Arts Organizations16   and Individual Artists)..........................7,570,40017  For Grants and Financial Assistance for18   Underserved Constituencies.......................3,308,00019  For Grants and Financial Assistance for20   Arts Education...................................3,429,00021  For Grants and Administrative Expenses22   Associated with Programs Supporting the  HB5654- 2 -OMB104 00216 NLG 10216 b1   Visual Arts, Performing Arts, Languages,2   and Related Activities...........................2,899,800 3    Section 10. The amount of $1,250,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Arts 5Council Federal Grant Fund to Illinois Arts Council for Grants 6and Programs to Enhance the Cultural Environment. 7    Section 15. The amount of $1,657,800, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for grants to certain public 10radio and television stations and related administrative 11expenses, pursuant to the Public Radio and Television Grant 12Act. 13    Section 20. In addition to other amounts appropriated for 14this purpose, the following named sum, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, respectively, for the object and purpose 16hereinafter named, is appropriated to the Illinois Arts 17Council to enhance the cultural environment in Illinois:18Payable from Illinois Arts Council Federal Grant Fund:19  For Grants and Programs to Enhance20   the Cultural Environment and associated21   administrative costs................................75,000 22    Section 25. The sum of $1,445,000, or so much thereof as   HB5654- 3 -OMB104 00216 NLG 10216 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for a grant to the Illinois 3Humanities Council. 4    Section 30. The sum of $907,500, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 6the Illinois Arts Council for grants to support arts 7programming in schools. 8    Section 35. The sum of $393,000, or so much thereof as may 9be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 10the Illinois Arts Council for administrative costs. 11    Section 40. The sum of $70,000, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Arts Council 13State Trust Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for all costs of 14grants and programs in the performance of its duties under the 15Arts Council Act. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.